sl-SI: Oblika mineralne spojine: Aspartat; Bisglicinat; Karbonat; Klorid; Citrat; Glukonat; Glicinat; L-treonat; Malat; Oksid; Drugo
ru: Форма минерального соединения: Аспартат; Бисглицинат; Карбонат; Хлорид; Цитрат; Глюконат; Глицинат; L-треонат; Малат; Оксид; Другой
ja: ミネラル化合物形態: アスパラギン酸塩; ビスグリシン酸塩; 炭酸塩; 塩化物; クエン酸塩; グルコン酸塩; グリシン酸塩; L-トレオン酸塩; リンゴ酸塩; 酸化物; その他
es: Forma del compuesto mineral: Aspartato; Bisglicinato; Carbonato; Cloruro; Citrato; Gluconato; Glicinato; L-treonato; Malato; Óxido; Otros
fr: Forme du composé minéral: Aspartate; Bisglycinate; Carbonate; Chlorure; Citrate; Gluconate; Glycinate; L-thréonate; Malate; Oxyde; Autre
pt-BR: Forma do composto mineral: Aspartato; Bisglicinato; Carbonato; Cloreto; Citrato; Gluconato; Glicinato; L-treonato; Malato; Óxido; Outro
fi: Mineraaliyhdisteen muoto: Aspartaatti; Bisglysinaatti; Karbonaatti; Kloridi; Sitraatti; Glukonaatti; Glysinaatti; L-treonaatti; Malaatti; Oksidi; Muu
ro-RO: Forma compusului mineral: Aspartat; Bisglicinat; Carbonat; Clorură; Citrat; Gluconat; Glicinat; L-treonat; Malat; Oxid; Altele
pt-PT: Forma do composto mineral: Aspartato; Bisglicinato; Carbonato; Cloreto; Citrato; Gluconato; Glicinato; L-Treonato; Malato; Óxido; Outro
zh-TW: 礦物質化合物形式: 天門冬氨酸鹽; 雙甘氨酸鹽; 碳酸鹽; 氯化物; 檸檬酸鹽; 葡萄糖酸鹽; 甘氨酸鹽; 左旋蘇糖酸鹽; 蘋果酸鹽; 氧化物; 其他
cs: Forma minerální sloučeniny: Aspartát; Bisglycinát; Uhličitan; Chlorid; Citrát; Glukonát; Glycinát; L-threonát; Malát; Oxid; Jiné
sv: Mineralföreningsform: Aspartat; Bisglycinat; Karbonat; Klorid; Citrat; Glukonat; Glycinat; L-treonat; Malat; Oxid; Övrigt
hr-HR: Oblik mineralnog spoja: Aspartat; Bisglicinat; Karbonat; Klorid; Citrat; Glukonat; Glicinat; L-treonat; Malat; Oksid; Ostalo
tr: Mineral bileşik formu: Aspartat; Bisglisinaz; Karbonat; Klorür; Sitrat; Glukonat; Glisinaz; L-treonat; Malat; Oksit; Diğer
el: Μορφή ανόργανης ένωσης: Ασπαρτικό; Δισγλυκινικό; Ανθρακικό; Χλωριούχο; Κιτρικό; Γλυκονικό; Γλυκινικό; L-Θρεονικό; Μηλικό; Οξείδιο; Άλλο
pl: Forma związku mineralnego: Asparaginian; Bisglicynian; Węglan; Chlorek; Cytrynian; Glukonian; Glicynian; L-treonian; Jabłczan; Tlenek; Inne
zh-CN: 矿物质化合物形式: 天门冬氨酸盐; 双甘氨酸盐; 碳酸盐; 氯化物; 柠檬酸盐; 葡萄糖酸盐; 甘氨酸盐; L-苏糖酸盐; 苹果酸盐; 氧化物; 其他
en: Mineral compound form: Aspartate; Bisglycinate; Carbonate; Chloride; Citrate; Gluconate; Glycinate; L-Threonate; Malate; Oxide; Other
lt-LT: Mineralų junginio forma: Aspartatas; Bisglicinatas; Karbonatas; Chloridas; Citratas; Gliukonatas; Glicinatas; L-treonatas; Malatas; Oksidas; Kita
bg-BG: Форма на минерално съединение: Аспартат; Бисглицинат; Карбонат; Хлорид; Цитрат; Глюконат; Глицинат; L-треонат; Малат; Оксид; Други
hu: Ásványi vegyület formája: Aszpartát; Biszglicinát; Karbonát; Klorid; Citrát; Glükonát; Glicinát; L-treonát; Malát; Oxid; Egyéb
it: Forma del composto minerale: Aspartato; Bisglicinato; Carbonato; Cloruro; Citrato; Gluconato; Glicinato; L-treonato; Malato; Ossido; Altro
sk-SK: Forma minerálnej zlúčeniny: Aspartát; Bisglycínát; Uhličitan; Chlorid; Citrát; Glukonát; Glycínát; L-treonát; Malát; Oxid; Iné
nb: Mineralforbindelsesform: Aspartat; Bisglysinat; Karbonat; Klorid; Sitrat; Glukonat; Glysinat; L-treonat; Malat; Oksid; Annet
nl: Mineraalverbindingsvorm: Aspartaat; Bisglycinaat; Carbonaat; Chloride; Citraat; Gluconaat; Glycinaat; L-threonaat; Malaat; Oxide; Andere
ko: 미네랄 화합물 형태: 아스파르트산염; 비스글리시네이트; 탄산염; 염화물; 시트레이트; 글루콘산염; 글리시네이트; L-트레오네이트; 말레이트; 산화물; 기타
vi: Dạng hợp chất khoáng chất: Aspartate; Bisglycinate; Carbonate; Chloride; Citrate; Gluconate; Glycinate; L-Threonate; Malate; Oxide; Khác
de: Mineralverbindungsform: Aspartat; Bisglycinat; Carbonat; Chlorid; Citrat; Gluconat; Glycinat; L-Threonat; Malat; Oxid; Sonstiges
th: รูปแบบสารประกอบแร่ธาตุ: แอสพาร์เตต; ไบสไกลซิเนต; คาร์บอเนต; คลอไรด์; ซิเตรต; กลูโคเนต; ไกลซิเนต; แอล-ทรีโอเนต; มาเลต; ออกไซด์; อื่นๆ
da: Mineralforbindelsesform: Aspartat; Bisglycinat; Karbonat; Klorid; Citrat; Glukonat; Glycinat; L-threonat; Malat; Oxid; Andet